Maryland, session 2026, HB1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11–109(c), (d), (e), and (f) of Article – Real Property of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 11–109(d), (e), (f), and (g), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–109.
(a) The affairs of the condominium shall be governed by a council of unit owners
which, even if unincorporated, is constituted a legal entity for all purposes. The council of
unit owners shall be comprised of all unit owners.
(b) The bylaws may authorize or provide for the delegation of any power of the
council of unit owners to a board of directors, officers, managing agent, or other person for
the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the council of unit owners.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MEETING WITH A
CONDOMINIUM DEVELOPER.
(2) ALL EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ALL MEETINGS OF THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OR A GOVERNING
BODY AND ALL SPECIAL MEETINGS OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS SHALL BE
RECORDED:
(1) (I) BY VIDEO WITH AUDIO; OR
(2) (II) BY AUDIO ONLY.
(3) A MEETING MAY NOT BE RECORDED IF A MEMBER IN GOOD
STANDING WHO IS IN ATTENDANCE AT THE MEETING OBJECTS.
(4) A RECORDING OF A MEETING MAY NOT BE USED IN PLACE OF
WRITTEN AND APPROVED MEETING MINUTES.

HOUSE BILL 1362 3
(5) ANY FEES ASSOCIATED WITH RECORDING A MEETING MUST BE
INCLUDED IN THE BUDGET AND APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS.
11–109.1.
(a) A meeting of the board of directors may be held in closed session only for the
following purposes:
(1) Discussion of matters pertaining to employees and personnel;
(2) Protection of the privacy or reputation of individuals in matters not
related to the council of unit owners’ business;
(3) Consultation with legal counsel on legal matters;
(4) Consultation with staff personnel, consultants, attorneys, board
members, or other persons in connection with pending or potential litigation or other legal
matters;
(5) Investigative proceedings concerning possible or actual criminal
misconduct;
(6) Consideration of the terms or conditions of a business transaction in the
negotiation stage if the disclosure could adversely affect the economic interests of the
council of unit owners;
(7) Complying with a specific constitutional, statutory, or judicially
imposed requirement protecting particular proceedings or matters from public disclosure;
or
(8) Discussion of individual owner assessment accounts.
(b) If a meeting is held in closed session under subsection (a) of this section:
(1) An action may not be taken and a matter may not be discussed if it is
not permitted by subsection (a) of this section; [and]
(2) A statement of the time, place, and purpose of any closed meeting, the
record of the vote of each board member by which any meeting was closed, and the authority
under this section for closing any meeting shall be included in the minutes of the next
meeting of the board of directors; AND
(3) RECORDATION OF A MEETING REQUIRED BY § 11–109(C) OF THIS
SUBTITLE MAY BE PAUSED FOR THE DURATION OF THE CLOSED PORTION OF THE
MEETING.

HOUSE BILL 1362
11B–111.
Except as provided in this title, and notwithstanding anything contained in any of
the documents of the homeowners association:
(1) Subject to the provisions of item [(4)] (5) of this section, all meetings of
the homeowners association, including meetings of the board of directors or other governing
body of the homeowners association or a committee of the homeowners association, shall
be open to all members of the homeowners association or their agents;
(2) All members of the homeowners association shall be given reasonable
notice of all regularly scheduled open meetings of the homeowners association;
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A MEETING WITH A
HOUSING DEVELOPER;
(II) ALL EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ALL MEETINGS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, INCLUDING
MEETINGS OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR OTHER GOVERNING BODY OR A
COMMITTEE OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, SHALL BE RECORDED BY VIDEO
WITH AUDIO OR BY AUDIO ONLY;
(III) A MEETING MAY NOT BE RECORDED IF A MEMBER IN GOOD
STANDING WHO IS IN ATTENDANCE AT THE MEETING OBJECTS;
(IV) A RECORDING OF A MEETING MAY NOT BE USED IN PLACE
OF WRITTEN AND APPROVED MEETING MINUTES; AND
(V) ANY FEES ASSOCIATED WITH RECORDING A MEETING MUST
BE INCLUDED IN THE BUDGET AND APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS;
[(3)] (4) (i) This item does not apply to any meeting of a governing
body that occurs at any time before the lot owners, other than the developer, have a
majority of votes in the homeowners association, as provided in the declaration;
(ii) Subject to item (iii) of this item and to reasonable rules adopted
by a governing body, a governing body shall provide a designated period of time during a
meeting to allow lot owners an opportunity to comment on any matter relating to the
homeowners association;
(iii) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics
or at a special meeting, the lot owners’ comments may be limited to the topics listed on the
meeting agenda; and

HOUSE BILL 1362 5
(iv) The governing body shall convene at least one meeting each year
at which the agenda is open to any matter relating to the homeowners association;
[(4)] (5) A meeting of the board of directors or other governing body of the
homeowners association or a committee of the homeowners association may be held in
closed session only for the following purposes:
(i) Discussion of matters pertaining to employees and personnel;
(ii) Protection of the privacy or reputation of individuals in matters
not related to the homeowners association’s business;
(iii) Consultation with legal counsel on legal matters;
(iv) Consultation with staff personnel, consultants, attorneys, board
members, or other persons in connection with pending or potential litigation or other legal
matters;
(v) Investigative proceedings concerning possible or actual criminal
misconduct;
(vi) Consideration of the terms or conditions of a business
transaction in the negotiation stage if the disclosure could adversely affect the economic
interests of the homeowners association;
(vii) Compliance with a specific constitutional, statutory, or judicially
imposed requirement protecting particular proceedings or matters from public disclosure;
or
(viii) Discussion of individual owner assessment accounts;
[(5)] (6) If a meeting is held in closed session under item [(4)] (5) of this
section:
(i) An action may not be taken and a matter may not be discussed if
it is not permitted by item [(4)] (5) of this section; [and]
(ii) A statement of the time, place, and purpose of a closed meeting,
the record of the vote of each board or committee member by which the meeting was closed,
and the authority under this section for closing a meeting shall be included in the minutes
of the next meeting of the board of directors or the committee of the homeowners
association; and
(III) VIDEO OR AUDIO RECORDING OF THE MEETING REQUIRED
BY ITEM (3) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE PAUSED FOR THE DURATION OF THE CLOSED
PORTION OF THE MEETING; AND

HOUSE BILL 1362
[(6)] (7) (i) If the number of lot owners present in person or by proxy
at a properly called meeting is insufficient to constitute a quorum, an additional meeting
of the lot owners may be called for the same purpose if:
1. The notice of the initial properly called meeting stated:
A. That the procedure authorized by this item (6) might be
invoked; and
B. The date, time, and place of the additional meeting; and
2. A majority of the lot owners present vote in person or by
proxy to call for the additional meeting;
(ii) An additional meeting called under item (i) of this item shall
occur not less than 15 days after the initial properly called meeting;
(iii) 1. Not less than 10 days before the additional meeting, a
separate and distinct notice of the date, time, place, and purpose of the additional meeting
called under item (i) of this item shall be:
A. Delivered, mailed, or sent by electronic transmission, if
the requirements of § 11B–113.1 of this title are met, to each lot owner at the address shown
on the roster maintained by the homeowners association;
B. Advertised in a newspaper published in the county where
the homeowners association is located; or
C. If the homeowners association has a website, posted on the
homepage of the website; and
2. The notice shall contain the quorum and voting provisions
of item (iv) of this item;
(iv) 1. At the additional meeting, the lot owners present in
person or by proxy constitute a quorum; and
2. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a majority of the lot
owners present in person or by proxy:
A. May approve or authorize the proposed action at the
additional meeting; and
B. May take any other action that could have been taken at
the original meeting if a sufficient number of lot owners had been present; and

HOUSE BILL 1362 7
(v) This item [(6)] (7) may not be construed to affect the percentage
of votes required to amend the declaration or bylaws or to take any other action required
to be taken by a specified percentage of votes.
11B–112.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, all
books, MEETING RECORDINGS, and records kept by or on behalf of the homeowners
association shall be made available for examination or copying, or both, by a lot owner, a
lot owner’s mortgagee, or their respective duly authorized agents or attorneys, during
normal business hours, and after reasonable notice.
(ii) Books, MEETING RECORDINGS, and records required to be
made available under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall first be made available to a
lot owner no later than 15 business days after a lot is conveyed by the declarant and the lot
owner requests to examine or copy the books and records.
(iii) If a lot owner requests in writing a copy of financial statements
of the homeowners association, THE MEETING RECORDING, or the minutes of a meeting
of the governing body of the homeowners association to be delivered, the governing body of
the homeowners association shall compile and send the requested information by mail,
electronic transmission, or personal delivery:
1. Within 21 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared within the 3 years immediately preceding
receipt of the request; or
2. Within 45 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared more than 3 years before receipt of the
request.
(2) Books, MEETING RECORDINGS, and records kept by or on behalf of a
homeowners association may be withheld from public inspection, except for inspection by
the person who is the subject of the record or the person’s designee or guardian, to the
extent that they concern:
(i) Personnel records, not including information on individual
salaries, wages, bonuses, and other compensation paid to employees;
(ii) An individual’s medical records;
(iii) An individual’s personal financial records, including assets,
income, liabilities, net worth, bank balances, financial history or activities, and
creditworthiness;
(iv) Records relating to business transactions that are currently in
negotiation;

HOUSE BILL 1362
(v) The written advice of legal counsel; or
(vi) Minutes OR A RECORDING of a closed meeting of the governing
body of the homeowners association, unless a majority of a quorum of the governing body
of the homeowners association that held the meeting approves unsealing the minutes or a
recording of the minutes for public inspection.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.